Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.016

Powers and duties—Generally.

(1) The director of licensing shall supervise and administer the activities of the department of licensing and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director has the following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the responsibilities of the department;

(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(c) Appoint a deputy director and such assistant directors, special assistants, and administrators as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the department;

(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient administration, but the director is responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(f) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) The director may establish advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the department.

(4) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

[ 1999 c 240 s 4.]